South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3505.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 2, Chapter 15, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-15-245. (A) Unless a party shows good cause why the order should not be rendered, a court shall order additional periods of parenting time between a parent and a child to compensate for a denial of court-ordered parenting time that resulted from: (1) an investigation by the Department of Social Services that did not result in a finding of abuse or neglect against the parent; or (2) a material misrepresentation of fact made to the court by any person regarding that parent. (B) The additional periods of parenting time: (1) must be of the same type and duration of parenting time that was denied; and (2) may include weekend, holiday, and summer parenting time. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----